test/src/morphology/N-irm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - irm: # Noun 125 'eng /est hirm/fin' - full paradigm
     irm+N+Sg+Nom: irm
     irm+N+Sg+Gen: irm
     irm+N+Sg+Par: irmõ
     irm+N+Sg+Dat: irmõn
     irm+N+Sg+Ins: irmõks
     irm+N+Sg+Ill: irmõ
     irm+N+Sg+Ela: irmstõ
     irm+N+Pl+Nom: irmõd
     irm+N+Pl+Gen: irmõd
     irm+N+Pl+Par: irmidi
     irm+N+Pl+Dat: irmõdõn
     irm+N+Pl+Ins: irmõdõks
     irm+N+Pl+Ill: irmiž
     irm+N+Pl+Ela: irmist
